California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) The prepaid health plan shall maintain financial records and shall have an annual audit or additional audits after a determination by the director of good cause, performed by an independent certified public accountant. A prepaid health plan operated by a public entity shall have an annual audit performed in a manner approved by the department. All certified financial statements shall be filed with the department as soon as practical after the end of the prepaid health plan’s fiscal year and in any event, within a period not to exceed 90 days thereafter. These financial statements shall be filed with the department and shall be public records. The department shall perform routine auditing of prepaid
 health plan contractors and their affiliated subcontractors. Except in those instances where major unanticipated obstacles prevent, or after a determination by the director of good cause, the audits shall be scheduled and carried out jointly with audits carried out pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975, if audits under that act are carried out within time periods that satisfy the requirements of federal law. The department is authorized to contract with the Department of Managed Health Care
 to carry out the audits required by this section. The prepaid health plan shall make all of its books and records available for inspection, examination, or copying by the department during normal working hours at the prepaid health plan’s principal place of business or at such other place in California as the department shall designate. For good cause, the department may grant an exception to the time when annual financial statements are to be submitted to the department. The annual report required in Section 14313 shall include an itemization of expenditures made by each prepaid health plan for the following categories of expenditures: physician services, inpatient and outpatient hospital services, pharmaceutical services and prescription drugs, dental services, medical transportation services, vision care services, mental health services, laboratory services, X-ray services, enrollee
 education programs, marketing and enrollment costs, data-processing costs, other administrative costs and health service expenditures and any payments made to subcontractors, and the purposes of the payments, including, but not limited to, contributions to election campaigns.

(b) The requirements of a financial and administrative review by the department of any health care service plan licensed by the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care pursuant to Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code may be waived upon submission of the financial audit for the same period conducted by the Department of
 Managed Health Care pursuant to Section 1382 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 266, Sec. 7.   (AB 614)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14459.5.

(a) As delegated by the federal government, the department has responsibility for monitoring the quality of all Medicaid services provided in the state. A key component of this monitoring function is the performance of annual, independent, external reviews of the quality of services furnished under each state contract with a health maintenance organization, as specified by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(b) In accordance with Section 438.332 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the department shall require, through its contracts, that each managed care plan inform the department whether it has been accredited by
 a private independent accrediting entity.

(c) In accordance with Section 438.332 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the department shall require, through its contracts, that each managed care plan that has received accreditation by a private independent accrediting entity shall authorize the private independent accrediting entity to provide the department a copy of its most recent accreditation review, including all of the following:

(1) Accreditation status, survey type, and level, as applicable.

(2) Accreditation results, including recommended actions or improvements, corrective action plans, and summaries of findings.

(3) Expiration date of the
 accreditation.

(d) The Legislature finds and declares that the final report obtained from the external reviews will provide valid and reliable information regarding health care outcomes and the overall quality of care delivered by the managed care plans.

(e) The department shall make the final report of each external review available, within 30 calendar days of completion, to the fiscal and health policy committees of the Legislature.

(f) In accordance with Section 438.332 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the department shall make the accreditation status for each contracted entity available on its Internet Web site, including whether each entity has been accredited, and if applicable, the name of the
 accrediting entity, accreditation program, and accreditation level. The department shall update this information at least annually.

(g) Subdivisions (b), (c), and (f) shall be effective for the rating period for managed care plan contracts beginning on or after July 1, 2017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 511, Sec. 30.   (AB 1688)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14459.6.

(a) The department shall establish a list of performance measures to ensure dental health plans meet quality criteria required by the department. The list shall specify the benchmarks used by the department to determine whether and the extent to which a dental health plan meets each performance measure. Commencing January 1, 2013, and quarterly thereafter, the list of performance measures established by the department along with each plan’s performance shall be posted on the department’s Internet Web site. The Department of Managed Health Care and the advisory committee established pursuant to Section 14089.08 shall have access to all performance measures and benchmarks used by the department as described in this section.

(1) Commencing April 30, 2017, the quarterly reporting required by this subdivision shall be posted in the following manner:

(A) On or before April 30, 2017, the reporting shall be posted for the July 2016 to September 2016, inclusive, fiscal quarter.

(B) After April 30, 2017, the reporting shall be posted on a quarterly basis on or before April 30, July 31, October 31, and January 31 for the fiscal quarter ending seven months prior.

(2) The performance measures established by the department shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following: provider network adequacy, overall utilization of dental services, annual dental visits, the total number of patients seen on
 a per-provider basis and the total number of dental services rendered by each provider during each calendar year, use of preventive dental services, use of dental treatment services, use of examinations and oral health evaluations, sealant to restoration ratio, filling to preventive services ratio, treatment to caries prevention ratio, use of dental sealants, use of diagnostic services, and survey of member satisfaction with plans and providers.

(3) The survey of member satisfaction with plans and providers shall be the same dental version of the Consumer Assessment of Healthcare Providers and Systems (CAHPS) survey as used by the Healthy Families Program.

(4) The department shall notify dental health plans at least 30 days prior to the implementation date of these performance measures.

(5) The department shall include the initial list of performance measures and benchmarks in any dental health contracts entered into between the department and a dental health plan pursuant to Section 14204.

(6) The department shall update performance measures and benchmarks and establish additional performance measures and benchmarks in accordance with all of the following:

(A) The department shall consider performance measures and benchmarks established by other states, the federal government, and national organizations developing dental program performance and quality measures.

(B) The department shall notify dental health plans at least 30 days
 prior to the implementation date of updates or changes to performance measures and benchmarks. The department shall also post these updates or changes on its Internet Web site at least 30 days prior to implementation in order to provide transparency to the public.

(C) To ensure that the dental health needs of Medi-Cal beneficiaries are met, the department shall, when evaluating performance measures and benchmarks for retention on, addition to, or deletion from the list, consider all of the following criteria:

(i) Monthly, quarterly, annual, and multiyear Medi-Cal dental managed care trended data.

(ii) County and statewide Medi-Cal dental fee-for-service performance and quality ratings.

(iii) Other state and national dental program performance and quality measures.

(iv) Other state and national performance ratings.

(b) In establishing and updating the performance measures and benchmarks, the department shall consult the advisory committee established pursuant to Section 14089.08, as well as dental health plan representatives and other stakeholders, including representatives from counties, local dental societies, nonprofit entities, legal aid entities, and other interested parties.

(c) In evaluating a dental health plan’s ability to meet the criteria established through the performance measures and benchmarks, the department shall select specific performance measures from those established by
 the department in subdivision (a) as the basis for establishing financial or other incentives or disincentives, including, but not limited to, bonuses, payment withholds, and adjustments to beneficiary assignment to plan algorithms. These incentives and disincentives shall be included in the dental health plan contracts.

(d) (1) The department shall designate a qualified external quality review organization (EQRO) that shall conduct external quality reviews for any dental health plan contracting with the department pursuant to Section 14204.

(2) As determined by the department, but at least annually, dental health plans shall arrange for an external quality of care review with the EQRO designated by the department that evaluates the dental health plan’s
 performance in meeting the performance measures established in this section. Dental health plans shall cooperate with and assist the EQRO in this review. The Department of Managed Health Care shall have direct access to all external quality of care review information upon request to the department.

(3) (A) No later than July 1, 2018, the department shall require that the dental EQRO shall have sufficient information to use in performing the review, and the department shall require the external quality review (EQR) to comply with the following requirements:

(i) The information used to carry out the review shall be obtained from the EQR-related activities in accordance with federal Medicaid regulations, including Section 438.358 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal
 Regulations, or, if applicable, from a Medicare or private accreditation review as authorized under Section 438.360 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(ii) For each EQR-related activity, the information gathered for use in the EQR shall include the elements described in federal Medicaid regulations, including the elements described in Section 438.364(a)(2)(i) to (iv), inclusive, of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(iii) The information provided to the EQRO in accordance with this paragraph is obtained through methods consistent with the protocols established by the federal Secretary of Health and Human Services in accordance with federal Medicaid regulations, including Section 438.352 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(iv) The results of the reviews are made available as specified in federal Medicaid regulations, including Section 438.364 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(B) The qualified EQRO shall produce and submit to the department an annual EQR technical report in accordance with Section 438.364(a) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The department shall finalize the annual technical report by April 30 of each year.

(C) Once the annual technical report is finalized, the department shall post by April 30 of each year the most recent copy of the
 annual EQR technical report on the Internet Web site required under Section 438.10(c)(3) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(D) An external quality of care review shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following: performance on the selected performance measures and benchmarks established and updated by the department, the CAHPS member or consumer satisfaction survey referenced in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), reporting systems, and methodologies for calculating performance measures. An external quality of care review that includes all of the above components shall be paid for by the dental health plan and posted online annually, or at any other frequency specified by the department, on the department’s Internet Web site. The department shall provide printed or electronic copies of the information specified
 under Section 438.364(a) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, upon request, to interested parties, such as participating health care providers, enrollees and potential enrollees of the managed care plan entity, beneficiary advocacy groups, and members of the general public.

(E) The department shall make the information specified in Section 438.364(a) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations available in alternative formats for persons with disabilities, when requested.

(e) All marketing methods and activities to be used by dental plans shall comply with subdivision (b) of Section 10850, Sections 14407.1, 14408, 14409, 14410, and 14411, and Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, including Sections 53880 and 53881 of Title 22 of the California Code of
 Regulations. Each dental plan shall submit its marketing plan to the department for review and approval.

(f) Each dental plan shall submit its member services procedures, beneficiary informational materials, and any updates to those procedures or materials to the department for review and approval. The department shall ensure that member services procedures and beneficiary informational materials are clear and provide timely and fair processes for accepting and acting upon complaints, grievances, and disenrollment requests, including procedures for appealing decisions regarding coverage or benefits.

(g) Each dental plan shall submit its provider compensation agreements to the department for review and approval.

(h) The department shall post on its Internet Web site a copy of all final reports completed by the Department of Managed Health Care regarding dental managed care plans.

(i) The department shall ensure, to the greatest degree possible, that the categories of data and performance measures selected under this section are consistent with the categories of data and performance measures selected under Section 14132.915.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 511, Sec. 31.   (AB 1688)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14459.7.

(a) The department shall implement a Management Information System/Decision Support System (MIS/DSS) for the Medi-Cal Program, that shall integrate data from managed care plans to monitor and evaluate the quality of care provided to beneficiaries, including access to services, establish provider rates, and analyze ways to improve both the managed care and fee-for-service systems.

(b) The department shall provide the fiscal and health policy committees of the Legislature with an annual progress and status report on the implementation of the MIS/DSS. The annual progress and status report shall include a description of the current status of the project, including a list of the specific project objectives that have and have not been met at the time of the report and a comparison of the actual progress of the project with the most recent project schedule approved by the Legislature. The report also shall include estimated expenditures and staffing for the current fiscal year and proposed expenditures and staffing for the next fiscal year as well as a summary of cumulative total project expenditures to date and a projection of future expenditures necessary to complete the project.

(c) The department shall provide system or information access to the fiscal and health policy committees of the Legislature, with the most cost-effective technology available, by the conclusion of the third phase of this multiphase project. Access shall include both the management information system and ad hoc report systems, or their equivalent, with safeguards to block access to individual patient identities. Public access shall be provided to at least the management information system summary presentation, or an equivalent, by the time of project completion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 294, Sec. 78.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14459.8.

(a) By no later than March 15, 2013, with annual updates thereafter, the department shall provide the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature with either a comprehensive report or separate reports on dental managed care in the Counties of Sacramento and Los Angeles. This report shall articulate specific changes and improvements implemented to increase Medi-Cal beneficiary access to preventive services and dental treatment, the utilization of services, and beneficiary satisfaction. Key measures, outcomes, and department findings pertaining to participating dental managed care plans and provider networks shall also be included.

(b) Any report provided pursuant to subdivision (a) on
 the County of Sacramento shall also provide data regarding the outcomes and findings from the beneficiary dental exception (BDE) process implemented by the department pursuant to Section 14089.09, including the consideration of voluntary enrollment in the County of Sacramento as compared to the existing mandatory enrollment.

(c) The department may seek foundation funding or federal grant funding to facilitate data analysis and reporting as applicable for this purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 23, Sec. 115.   (AB 1467)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14460.

A schedule of reviews, visits, and audits shall be jointly established by the Department of Managed Health Care or the Department of Insurance, as the case may be, and the State Department of Health Services. Nothing in Section 14456, 14457, or 14459 shall be construed to prohibit the State Department of Health Services from conducting reviews, visits, or audits either jointly or individually, for the purpose of following up on findings resulting from reviews, visits, or audits carried out in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 857, Sec. 96.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14461.

Upon request by the department, each prepaid health plan shall submit to the department a copy of any financial report submitted to any other public or private organization, if such report differs in content or format from any financial report already submitted to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14462.

In accordance with Section 14081.5, the provisions of Section 15459 of the Government Code shall not be applicable to a hospital, whether or not it negotiates to obtain a contract pursuant to Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081), if the hospital predominantly serves or will predominantly serve members of a health maintenance organization that has negotiated in good faith to obtain a prepaid contract pursuant to this part or pursuant to Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089).

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1018, Sec. 3.   Effective September 22, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

14463.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, each prepaid health plan shall be responsible for all of the costs of services rendered under the provisions of this chapter to any Medi-Cal beneficiary enrolled in the plan.

(b) The department shall bear the costs of providing to each Medi-Cal beneficiary enrolled in a prepaid health plan the services covered under the plan, to the extent that the aggregate of these costs, based on Medi-Cal reimbursement levels, and exclusive of third-party recoveries, exceeds the 12-month risk limit. The risk limit shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) based on Medi-Cal reimbursement levels, shall be specified in the contract between the department and the plan, and shall be determined concurrently with the annual determination of rates of payment.

The department shall have the authority to adopt regulations to increase the risk limit, to an amount not to exceed thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000). Regulations to increase the risk limit shall be based upon and supported by changes in prepaid health plan rates paid by the department and changes in the medical component of the Consumer Price Index (CPI) as actuarially determined by the department. It is the intent of the Legislature that these risk limit adjustments are not to exceed thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) until the 1986–87 fiscal year or beyond. For plans having contracts in existence on the effective date of this section, the risk limit shall be announced on or before the first day of each state fiscal year, to become effective concurrently with the effective date for the new rates of payment for the next succeeding state fiscal year.

The department may negotiate with a prepaid health plan a mutually agreed-to risk limit in an amount in excess of thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000).

Within 90 days of the receipt of the documentation required under paragraph (2), the department shall pay the reimbursement provided for by this section to the extent that it determines that the services rendered were medically necessary, and that the amount of the payments sought for those services is reasonable. The department may, if a dispute exists as to whether the services rendered were medically necessary or if the amount of the payments for those services was reasonable, delay paying the reimbursement for such services until a final determination of the dispute is made.

(1) Each prepaid health plan shall arrange and provide initial payment, at Medi-Cal reimbursement levels, for medically necessary care for any Medi-Cal beneficiary enrolled in the plan when the cost for this care exceeds the 12-month risk limit. No person shall be disenrolled by any prepaid health plan for the sole reason that the cost of his or her care under the plan has exceeded the risk limit.

(2) As a condition of reimbursement for costs of care in excess of the risk limit as to a Medi-Cal beneficiary enrolled in a prepaid health plan, the plan must submit to the department, in a format to be designated by the department, documentation of all costs incurred for services to the beneficiary during the 12-month period.

(c) No prepaid health plan may enter into any subcontract that would in any way limit its obligation assumed under this chapter to retain the significant risk of the cost of services rendered under this chapter to any Medi-Cal beneficiary enrolled in the plan.

(d) As a condition of the department’s approval of any subcontract entered into by a prepaid health plan under this chapter, the plan shall specify its retention of significant risk by designating one of the options under subdivision (e) as its operating definition of significant risk, or by any other method approved by the department that would meet the requirement set forth in subdivision (c). 

(e) “Significant risk” means financial responsibility for either of the following:

(1) All expenditures in excess of 115 percent of the specified total expenditures estimated under each subcontract.

(2) All inpatient hospitalization expenditures as determined by the department, including expenditures for services connected with hospitalization.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 14462 (as amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1579) by Stats. 1986, Ch. 248, Sec. 272.)
-------------------------------------------

14464.

(a) The department may negotiate and establish an individual administrative cost limit in its contracts with each prepaid health plan or Medi-Cal managed care plan contracting under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) providing services to Medi-Cal beneficiary enrollees.

(b) As used in this section, prepaid health plan or Medi-Cal managed care plan “administrative costs” includes net profit or revenue in excess of expenditures, in addition to those items set forth in Section 1300.78 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations and those items set forth by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 859, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.3. Provision of Medical Care by Nonplan Providers to Enrollees of Prepaid Health Plans [14465. - 14466.]

14465.

For purposes of this article and Section 14454, “emergency services” shall have the same meaning as that established in Section 1317.1 of the Health and Safety Code for “emergency services and care.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1052, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

14466.

The plan shall make a request to the department to temporarily disenroll any enrollee for the month or months in which the patient is hospitalized and remains in stable condition, and refuses to be transferred from a nonplan provider’s facility to a plan’s facility when it is medically safe to do so.

This section shall only be applicable in Los Angeles County because of problems the county has experienced in treating nonplan Medi-Cal enrollees in county hospitals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1052, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Conflict of Interest [14475. - 14482.]

14475.

(a) No prepaid health plan or pilot program contract shall be approved or renewed by the department pursuant to this chapter if any state officer or state employee or his spouse or minor child has a substantial financial interest, as defined by Section 14478, in any of the following:

(1) The contract or the contracting organization.

(2) Any contract with the contracting organization.

(3) Procurement of a contract for the contracting organization.

(b) As used in subdivision (a), “state officer or state employee” means any person included in Section 14477 and includes any employee in the department who has a direct responsibility for the negotiation, development, or management of a prepaid health plan contracted under the provisions of this chapter. The director shall publish regulations determining the class of employees covered by this subdivision.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14476.

The chief executive, sole proprietor, or managing partner of each prepaid health plan shall file with the department an annual statement disclosing any purchases or leases of services, equipment, supplies or real property by the plan from any entity in which any of the following persons have a substantial financial interest as defined by Section 14478:

(a) Any person also having a substantial financial interest in the plan.

(b) Any director, officer, partner, trustee or employee of the plan.

(c) Any member of the immediate family of any person designated in (a) or (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14477.

(a) For purposes of this article, “state officer” means a United States Senator or Member of Congress representing California, the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Controller, Treasurer, Attorney General, State Superintendent of Public Instruction, a Member of the Legislature, or a secretary of a state agency.

(b) For purposes of this article, “state employee” means any staff member of a state agency secretary who holds a policymaking position, any member of the Governor’s staff who holds a policymaking position, or any administrative aide or committee consultant of the Legislature. “State employee” includes the appointive or civil service employee of the highest class or grade in each department, system, program, section, or other administrative subdivision of the State Department of Health Services as defined in regulations adopted by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

14478.

(a) As used in this chapter, “substantial financial interest” means the ownership of common stock, preferred stock, warrants, options, loans, partnership interests, debt instruments, or other ownership interest, if consisting of, or convertible to, equity investments in an entity contracting with the department under the provisions of this chapter or an entity contracting with a current or proposed contractor doing business with the department under the provisions of this chapter, and such ownership interest in terms of fair market value is not less than the greater of the following:

(1) One thousand dollars ($1,000).

(2) Five percent or more of the total fair market value of all equity investments in the entity, including ownership interests convertible to such investments.

A convertible debt includes bonds, notes, debentures, and mortgages.

(b) As used in this chapter, “immediate family” means an individual’s spouse and minor dependent children and any other person over which the individual has legal control.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14479.

(a) No prepaid health plan or pilot program contract shall be approved, renewed or continued by the department if a state officer or state employee is employed in a management or consultant position by the contractor or a subcontractor to the contractor within one year after the state officer or state employee terminated state employment.

(b) For purposes of this section, “state employee” means any appointive or civil service employee of the department or of the Health and Welfare Agency who, within two years prior to leaving state employment, was responsible for development, negotiation, contract management, or supervision of a prepaid health plan or prepaid health plan contract.

For purposes of this section, employees of the department who are assigned as contract managers shall not be subject to the provisions of this section unless they are employed by a prepaid health plan or a subcontractor of a prepaid health plan for which, within two years prior to leaving state employment, they were responsible for the development, negotiation, contract management, or direct supervision over the prepaid health plan contract. This section shall not apply to any employee, appointee, or person on contract with the department who is employed, appointed, or contracted with by the department either:

(1) To fulfill the purposes of a federal grant, provided that such person does not supervise, develop, manage, or negotiate a prepaid health plan contract; or 

(2) To fulfill on a temporary basis, not to exceed 120 days, a specific function for the department which does not include supervising, developing, managing, or negotiating a prepaid health plan contract.

(c) The requirements of this section shall apply to any contract entered into on or after the operative date of this section and to any state officer or state employee who is employed by such contractor or subcontractor thereof on or after such operative date. This section shall not apply to any state officer or employee who terminated state employment prior to such operative date.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14480.

No prepaid health plan or pilot program contract with an existing or proposed contractor shall be approved or renewed if a state officer or state employee provides legal or management services to the contracting organization. For the purposes of this section no state officer or state employee shall share in the income or any remuneration derived from the providing of legal or management services to a contracting organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14481.

No prepaid health plan or pilot program contract shall be approved or renewed if any state officer or state employee receives anything of value for the purpose of influencing or attempting to influence the negotiations for approval or renewal of the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14482.

No prepaid health plan shall contract with any subcontractor other than the plan’s subsidiary corporation, its parent corporation, or another subsidiary of its parent corporation, or an affiliate of the prepaid health plan whose financial statements are consolidated with that of the prepaid health plan at the time of the annual audit by the independent auditors of the plan and when the quarterly and annual financial statements are filed with the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care, if any of the following persons connected with the plan have a substantial financial interest, as defined by Section 14478, in such subcontractor:

(a) Any person also having a substantial financial interest in the plan.

(b) Any director, officer, partner, trustee, or employee of the plan.

(c) Any member of the immediate family of any person designated in (a) or (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 857, Sec. 97.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Pilot Programs [14490. - 14499.6.]

14490.

In providing benefits under this chapter and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000), the director shall aggressively seek the development of alternative forms of financing and delivering health care services. In carrying out the intent of this article, the director shall contract with institutional providers, counties, or other organizations to establish pilot programs that demonstrate the value, or lack thereof, of such a program in delivering or financing health care services in such a manner. Each pilot program shall be for a specified duration not to exceed five years, and each pilot program shall be evaluated annually for its efficiency, effectiveness, and quality.

Upon a finding by the director that a pilot program contributes substantially to the availability of high quality health services and that those services are cost-effective, the director shall enter into a contract for a period of up to five years.

Where the director recommends implementation of a pilot program on a permanent basis, but finds that he or she is not able to implement on a permanent basis that program immediately upon conclusion of the program’s term, he or she may extend the duration of the pilot program until the evaluation or permanent implementation can be accomplished. The extension shall be for a term not in excess of one year, but may be renewed for additional one-year terms, provided that the director has completed an evaluation to include findings that would qualify an extension.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 17, Sec. 154.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14491.

The director shall pursue the feasibility of establishing the following as pilot programs:

(a) A capitated, risk-assuming contract with one or more regional fiscal intermediaries.

(b) A capitated, risk-assuming contract with acute care hospitals within a county or region.

(c) A capitated, risk-assuming contract with one or more organizations which provide payment to a specified class or classes of providers.

For purposes of this section, “risk-assuming” means the pilot program contractor agrees to assume the risk of utilization of services or costs of services, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14493.

The director shall also consider programs which demonstrate an innovative and economical use of health personnel and are approved pursuant to Article 18 (commencing with Section 429.70), Chapter 2, Part 1, Division 1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14494.

The director may enter into other contracts under this article which do one or more of the following:

(a) Demonstrate an innovative and economical use of health personnel.

(b) Emphasize preventive care.

(c) Stress new methods for controlling utilization of services.

(d) Stress new methods of reviewing provider competency or quality of care.

(e) Stress a more economical organization of health care resources and delivery systems.

(f) Provide an incentive to beneficiaries to seek the most economical level of care.

(g) Demonstrate innovative methods for health care financing, such as prospective budgeting in regard to enrolled population or volume of services.

(h) Test or demonstrate the feasibility of allowing California citizens to purchase Medi-Cal coverage at a premium rate determined by the department on an actuarial basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14495.

In establishing pilot programs, the director may do the following:

(a) Provide benefits based on class of recipient, class of benefit, geographical area, or any other reasonable classification.

(b) Modify, to the extent permitted by federal law, the scope and duration of benefits provided by Section 14132. The extent of coverage may be limited to a fixed number of days or to amount or duration of services.

(c) Modify, to the extent permitted by federal law, Medi-Cal eligibility determination processes or criteria.

(d) Allow for the provision of Medi-Cal benefits on a prepaid basis in a given geographical area exclusively by the pilot program.

(e) Assign persons eligible for Medi-Cal benefits to a pilot program or a prepaid health plan on a pilot basis, provided such persons shall be entitled to disenroll for any cause for a period of 30 days following the effective date of enrollment and to receive a Medi-Cal card pursuant to Section 14017.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14495.10.
